Hawaii statutes.
§431:10D-624 Compliance mitigation;
penalties. (a) An insurer shall be responsible for compliance with this
part. If a violation occurs because of the action or inaction of the insurer
or its insurance producer, the commissioner may order:

(1) An insurer to take reasonably appropriate
corrective action for any consumer harmed by the insurer's or its insurance
producer's violation of this part;

(2) A business entity, general agency, independent
agency, or the insurance producer to take reasonably appropriate corrective
action for any consumer harmed by the insurance producer's violation of this
part; and

(3) Appropriate penalties and sanctions.

(b) Any penalty applicable to an insurer,
a managing general agent, independent agencies, or a producer under article 13
of chapter 431 may be applicable to a violation of this part; provided that
penalties may be reduced or eliminated if corrective action for the consumer
was taken promptly after a violation was discovered or if the violation was not
part of a pattern or practice. [L 2007, c 257, pt of §2; am L 2011, c 108, §6]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next